North Dakota, session 69, HB1190.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 24-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Fallen military service members bridge committee - Continuing appropriation.
1. There is created the fallen military service members bridge committee. The committee
shall consider the naming of bridges and overpasses within the state's jurisdiction in
honor of nominated military service members who have fallen in service to the United
States.
2. The committee shall:
a. Create an application process for the submission of nominations;
b. Accept nomination applications from the public; and
c. Meet each October to review and select up to six nomination applications.
3. The department shall provide staffing and administrative services for the committee.
4. The committee consists of the following members or their designee:
a. The director of the department of transportation as chairman of the committee;
b. The adjutant general; and
c. The commissioner of the department of veterans' affairs.
5. Following the selection of a nomination application, the committee shall accept input
from veterans groups and the families of fallen military service members to arrange
signage, a signage installation date, and a dedication service for each bridge or
Page No. 1 25.0396.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
overpass selected by the committee to be named in honor of a military service
member.
6. The department may accept any appropriate signs or funds donated to the department
for the placement of signs. Any donated funds are appropriated to the department on a
continuing basis for the purpose of providing signs to the bridges and overpasses
selected by the committee.
Page No. 2 25.0396.01000